Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 14. Mariculture Revolving Loan Fund.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 changes to AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

to loans made before August 8, 2018, see sec. 16, ch. 93, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.10.890.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the state, under
AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

, to promote mariculture and the enhancement of the state’s shellfish fisheries by means of long-term, low-interest loans.

History.

(§ 1 ch 93 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 17, ch. 93, SLA 2018 makes this section effective August 28, 2018, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 16.10.900.
Mariculture revolving loan fund.

The mariculture revolving loan fund is created in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to carry out the purposes of AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

.

The mariculture revolving loan fund consists of the following:

money appropriated to, transferred to, or received by gift, grant, devise, bequest, or donation to the fund;

principal and interest payments or other income earned on loans or investments of the fund; and

money chargeable to principal or interest that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other process on loans made under AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

.

Money in the fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

.

Of the total amount available annually to the department to carry out the purposes of AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

, less any funds appropriated under (c) of this section, 60 percent shall be available solely for making loans under AS

16.10.910(a)(1)

and the remainder shall be available solely for making loans under AS

16.10.910(a)(2)

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012; am §§ 2, 3 ch 93 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 28, 2018, substituted “AS

16.10.890

–

16.10.945

” for “AS

16.10.900

–

16.10.945

” wherever it appears, and made a stylistic change; added (d).

Sec. 16.10.905.
Powers and duties of the department.

The department may

make loans to eligible applicants under AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

for the planning, construction, and operation of a

mariculture business;

hatchery that artificially propagates marine aquatic plants or shellfish; or

a shellfish enhancement project;

receive, take, hold, and administer any appropriation, transfer, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or donation of money for the fund;

establish amortization plans for repayment of loans, including extensions of the terms of loans;

allow an assumption of a loan if

the applicant meets the requirements established under this section; and

approval of the assumption would be consistent with the purposes of AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

;

establish the rate of interest for loans consistent with law;

charge and collect fees for services provided under AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided; and

designate agents and delegate powers as necessary to the agents.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012; am § 4 ch 93 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 28, 2018, substituted “AS

16.10.890

–

16.10.945

” for “AS

16.10.900

–

16.10.945

” wherever it appears, added (1)(B) and (C), and made related changes.

Sec. 16.10.910.
Eligibility.

For an applicant to be eligible for a loan under AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

, the applicant shall be

a resident of the state who has

a permitted mariculture farm location in this state; and

experience or training in the mariculture industry; or

a resident of the state or entity organized under the laws of this state that

holds a permit under AS

16.40.100

to operate a hatchery for the purpose of producing aquatic plants or shellfish; or

conducts shellfish enhancement projects.

In addition to the requirements set out in (a) of this section, the applicant

may not be eligible for financing from other recognized commercial lending institutions; or

shall be able to obtain only a portion of the total loan request from a recognized commercial lending institution.

To meet the residency requirements of (a) of this section, an individual applicant

shall physically reside in this state and maintain a domicile in this state during the 24 consecutive months preceding the date of application for the program; and

may not have

declared or established residency in another state; or

received residency or a benefit based on residency from another state.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012; am §§ 5, 6 ch 93 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 28, 2018, rewrote (a); in (c), made a stylistic change.

Sec. 16.10.915.
Limitations on loans.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, a loan under AS

16.10.890

—16.10.945

may not exceed

$100,000 a year for an applicant under AS

16.10.910(a)(1)

; or

$1,000,000 a year for an applicant under AS

16.10.910(a)(2)

;

may not, unless extended under AS

16.10.905

, exceed a term of

20 years for an applicant under AS

16.10.910(a)(1)

; or

30 years for an applicant under AS

16.10.910(a)(2)

;

may not bear interest at a rate greater than the prime rate, as defined in AS

44.88.599

, plus one percentage point, but which may not be less than five percent a year or more than nine percent a year;

must be secured by a first priority lien on collateral acceptable to the department; and

may not be made to a person who has a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application.

Subsequent loans may be made to a borrower under

AS

16.10.910(a)(1)

, if the total of the balances outstanding on the loans received by the borrower does not exceed $300,000; or

AS

16.10.910(a)(2)

, if the total of the balances outstanding on the loans received by the borrower does not exceed $1,000,000.

A loan under AS

16.10.910

may be made for the purchase of boats or vessels determined to be integral to the operation of the farm or hatchery.

For a loan made under AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

, the department may provide a reduction of the interest rate of not more than two percent if at least 50 percent of the loan proceeds are used by the borrower for purchasing products manufactured or produced in the state. When the department offers a reduction under this subsection, the department shall provide the reduction to all loan applicants who meet the criterion described in this subsection. In this subsection, “manufactured or produced” means processing, developing, or making an item into a new item with a distinct character and use.

The department may not make a loan to an applicant under AS

16.10.910(a)(2)

for a hatchery or shellfish enhancement project unless the department determines that the hatchery or enhancement project will

be managed in a financially viable manner that is reasonably expected to result in repayment of the loan; and

provide a significant contribution to common property fisheries or otherwise benefit the public interest.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012; am §§ 7 — 11 ch 93 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 28, 2018, rewrote (a) and (b); in (c), added “or hatchery” at the end; in (d), substituted “AS

16.10.890

–

16.10.945

” for “AS

16.10.900

–

16.10.945

” following “made under”; added (e).

Sec. 16.10.920.
Repayment of principal of and interest on loans.

The department may not require the repayment of the principal of and interest on a loan made under AS

16.10.910

during the first six years of the loan. However, for a loan made under AS

16.10.910(a)(2)

, the department may defer repayment of the principal of and interest on the loan for an additional period not to exceed the first 11 years of the loan. The department may provide that interest on the principal of a loan made under AS

16.10.910(a)(1)

does not accrue during a period not to exceed the first six years of the loan. For a loan made under AS

16.10.910(a)(2)

, the department shall provide that interest on the principal of the loan does not accrue during the first six years of the loan, and the department may provide that interest on the principal of the loan does not accrue during an additional period not to exceed the first 11 years of the loan.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012; am § 12 ch 93 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 28, 2018, made stylistic changes in the first sentence, added the second and last sentences, rewrote the third sentence, which read, “Interest on the principal of a loan made under AS

16.10.910

may be deferred for a period of not more than the first six years of the loan.”

Sec. 16.10.923.
Voluntary assessment on sale of shellfish.

An association of persons who hold entry permits under AS 16.43 comprising at least 51 percent of the persons holding entry permits and actively participating in a fishery to be benefited by a hatchery program may levy and collect an assessment from among its members for the purpose of securing and repaying a loan made under AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

.

Upon satisfactory demonstration to the department that an assessment levied under this section may reasonably be relied on to secure and repay a loan to be made under AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

, the department may make the loan.

History.

(§ 13 ch 93 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 17, ch. 93, SLA 2018 makes this section effective August 28, 2018, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 16.10.925.
Default.

If the borrower defaults on a note, the department shall notify the borrower of the default and the consequences of default by mailing a notice to the borrower’s most recent address provided to the department by the borrower or obtained by the department.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Sec. 16.10.930.
Special account established.

The foreclosure expense account is established as a special account in the mariculture revolving loan fund.

The department may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the state’s security interest in collateral on loans granted under AS

16.10.910

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after an obligor defaults.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Sec. 16.10.935.
Disposal of property acquired after default.

The department shall dispose of property acquired through default of a loan made under AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

. Disposal must be made in a manner that serves the best interest of the state and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012; am § 14 ch 93 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 28. 2018, substituted “AS

16.10.890

–

16.10.945

” for “AS

16.10.900

–

16.10.945

” following “a loan made under”.

Sec. 16.10.940.
Waiver of confidentiality.

The commissioner may release information about the borrower’s loan to any individual if release of the information has been authorized by the borrower.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Sec. 16.10.945.
Definitions.

In AS

16.10.890

—

16.10.945

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“hatchery” has the meaning given in AS

16.40.199

;

“mariculture” means the farming of shellfish and aquatic plants as defined in AS

16.40.199

;

“shellfish enhancement project” means a project to

augment the yield or harvest of shellfish above naturally occurring levels using a natural, artificial, or semiartificial production system; or

rehabilitate a shellfish stock by restoring it to its naturally occurring levels of productivity.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012; am § 15 ch 93 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 28, 2018, in the introductory language substituted “AS

16.10.890

–

16.10.945

” for “AS

16.10.900

–

16.10.945

”; added (3) and (5), and made related changes.